Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1442
Law enforcement reserve officer; not eligible for participation in certain pension funds or retirement systems.

Nothing in sections 81-1438 to 81-1446 shall be construed to authorize or permit a law enforcement reserve officer to become eligible for participation in any pension fund or retirement system created by the laws of this state to which regular deputy sheriffs or police officers may become members.

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 5.